North Carolina statutes. Chapter 106. Agriculture.
Part 4. Supervision of Fairs and Animal Exhibitions.

§ 106-520.1.
Definition.

As used in this Article, the word “fair” means a bona fide exhibition designed, arranged and operated to promote, encourage and improve agriculture, horticulture, livestock, poultry, dairy products, mechanical fabrics, domestic economy, and 4-H Club and Future Farmers of America activities, by offering premiums and awards for the best exhibits thereof or with respect thereto.

History.

1949, c. 829, s. 1.

§ 106-520.2.
Use of “fair” in name of exhibition.

It shall be unlawful for any person, firm, corporation, association, club, or other group of persons to use the word “fair” in connection with any exhibition, circus, show, or other variety of exhibition unless such exhibition is a fair within the meaning of

G.S. 106-520.1

.

History.

1949, c. 829, s. 1.

§ 106-520.3.
Commissioner of Agriculture to regulate.

The Commissioner of Agriculture, with the advice and approval of the State Board of Agriculture, is hereby authorized, empowered and directed to make rules and regulations with respect to classification, operation and licensing of fairs, so as to insure that such fairs shall conform to the definition set out in

G.S. 106-520.1

, and shall best promote the purposes of fairs as set out in such definition. Every fair, and every exhibition using the word “fair” in its name, except fairs classified by the Commissioner of Agriculture as noncommercial community fairs, must comply with the standards, rules and regulations set up and promulgated by the Commissioner of Agriculture, and must secure a license from the Commissioner of Agriculture before such exhibition or fair is staged or operated. No license shall be issued for any such exhibition or fair unless it meets the standards and complies with the rules and regulations of the Commissioner of Agriculture with respect thereto.

History.

1949, c. 829, s. 1.

§ 106-520.3A.
Animal exhibition regulation; permit required; civil penalties.

Title. — This section may be referred to as “Aedin’s Law”. This section provides for the regulation of animal exhibitions as they may affect the public health and safety.

Definitions. — As used in this section, unless the context clearly requires otherwise:

“Animal” means only those animals that may transmit infectious diseases.

“Animal exhibition” means any sanctioned agricultural fair where animals are displayed on the exhibition grounds for physical contact with humans.

Permit Required. — No animal exhibition may be operated for use by the general public unless the owner or operator has obtained an operation permit issued by the Commissioner. The Commissioner may issue an operation permit only after physical inspection of the animal exhibition and a determination that the animal exhibition meets the requirements of this section and rules adopted pursuant to this section. The Commissioner may deny, suspend, or revoke a permit on the basis that the exhibition does not comply with this section or rules adopted pursuant to this section.

Rules. — For the protection of the public health and safety, the Commissioner of Agriculture, with the advice and approval of the State Board of Agriculture, and in consultation with the Division of Public Health of the Department of Health and Human Services, shall adopt rules concerning the operation of and issuance of permits for animal exhibitions. The rules shall include requirements for:

Education and signage to inform the public of health and safety issues.

Animal areas.

Animal care and management.

Transition and nonanimal areas.

Hand-washing facilities.

Other requirements necessary for the protection of the public health and safety.

Educational Outreach. — The Department shall continue its consultative and educational efforts to inform agricultural fair operators, exhibitors, agritourism business operators, and the general public about the health risks associated with diseases transmitted by physical contact with animals.

Civil Penalty. — In addition to the denial, suspension, or revocation of an operation permit, the Commissioner may assess a civil penalty of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) against any person who violates a provision of this section or a rule adopted pursuant to this section. In determining the amount of the penalty, the Commissioner shall consider the degree and extent of harm caused by the violation.The clear proceeds of civil penalties assessed pursuant to this section shall be remitted to the Civil Penalty and Forfeiture Fund in accordance with

G.S. 115C-457.2

.

Legal Representation by Attorney General. — It shall be the duty of the Attorney General to represent the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services or designate a member of the Attorney General’s staff to represent the Department in all actions or proceedings in connection with this section.

History.

2005-191, s. 1(b).

§ 106-520.4.
Local supervision of fairs.

No county or regional fairs shall be licensed to be held unless such fair is operated under supervision of a local board of directors who shall employ appropriate managers, who shall be responsible for the conduct of such fair, and otherwise comply with the standards, rules and regulations promulgated by the Commissioner of Agriculture. The Commissioner of Agriculture, with the advice and approval of the State Board of Agriculture, shall make rules and regulations requiring county and regional fairs to emphasize agricultural, educational, home and industrial exhibits by providing adequate premiums.

History.

1949, c. 829, s. 1.

§ 106-520.5.
Reports.

Every fair shall make such reports to the Commissioner of Agriculture, as said Commissioner may require.

History.

1949, c. 829, s. 1.

§ 106-520.6.
Premiums and premium lists supplemented.

The State Board of Agriculture may supplement premiums and premium lists for county and regional fairs and the North Carolina State Fair, and improve and expand the facilities for exhibits at the North Carolina State Fair, at any time or times, out of any funds which may be available for such purposes.

History.

1949, c. 829, s. 1.

§ 106-520.7.
Violations made misdemeanor.

Any person who violates any provision of

G.S. 106-520.1

through

G.S. 106-520.6

is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

1949, c. 829, s. 1; 1993, c. 539, s. 797; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c).